Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1503
Employment of personnel; technical advisors.

The Director of Motor Vehicles shall have authority to employ such personnel, including legal, and technical advisors as may be necessary to carry out the duties of his office.

Laws 1957, c. 366, § 56, p. 1284.

The Director of Motor Vehicles has the authority to employ personnel, including legal personnel and technical advisors, as may be necessary to carry out the duties of his office. Koepp v. Jensen, 230 Neb. 489, 432 N.W.2d 237 (1988).

The authority of the Director of Motor Vehicles to delegate her implied consent revocation duties under section 39-669.16 (transferred to section 60-498.02) is fairly implied by this section. Fulmer v. Jensen, 221 Neb. 582, 379 N.W.2d 736 (1986).